Indiana, session 2026, SB196.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 8-1-42.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 42.5. Community Energy Facilities
Sec. 1. The definitions in IC 8-1-40 apply throughout this
chapter.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "community energy facility"
means a facility:
(1) that generates electricity;
(2) that is located on a single parcel of land;
(3) that is interconnected to the electric distribution grid;
(4) to which at least three (3) persons located in the electricity
supplier service area in which the facility is located have
entered into a subscription;
(5) in which at least sixty percent (60%) of the generating
capacity is allocated to subscriptions of twenty-five (25)
kilowatts or less; and
2026 IN 196—LS 6591/DI 150


(6) that is designed to offset the energy use of a specified set of
subscribers, with no single subscriber having more than a
twenty percent (20%) interest in the facility.
Sec. 3. (a) As used in this chapter, "community energy facility
organization" means an organization whose purpose is to
beneficially own and operate a community energy facility for the
subscribers to the community energy facility.
(b) A community energy facility organization may be a
for-profit, nonprofit, cooperative, or governmental entity
authorized by Indiana law.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "disadvantaged business
enterprise" has the meaning set forth in IC 5-16-6.5-1.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "low or moderate income" means
an individual or household income of not more than eighty percent
(80%) of the area median income based on United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development guidelines.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "nameplate capacity" has the
meaning set forth in 170 IAC 4-4.2-1.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "subscribing customer" means
a retail customer of an electricity supplier that enters into one (1)
or more subscriptions with one (1) or more community energy
facilities.
Sec. 8. As used in this chapter, "subscription" means a contract
between a subscriber and a community energy facility
organization.
Sec. 9. Not later than one hundred eighty (180) days after the
commission adopts rules under section 14 of this chapter, an
electricity supplier shall begin:
(1) allowing interconnection with the electricity supplier's
facilities by community energy facilities; and
(2) providing bill credits under section 10 of this chapter to
subscribing customers of the electricity supplier.
Sec. 10. (a) A community energy facility organization that
operates a community energy facility that is interconnected with
the facilities of an electricity supplier shall, not later than the
fifteenth day of each month, transmit to the electricity supplier a
report providing the following information:
(1) An updated list of subscribers to the community energy
facility in the immediately preceding month.
(2) The proportional output of the community energy facility
attributable to the subscription of each subscriber identified
under subdivision (1), calculated as follows:
2026 IN 196—LS 6591/DI 150


(A) If the subscriber subscribed to receive a specified
amount of electricity from the community energy facility
during the immediately preceding month, the subscriber's
subscription amount is the amount of electricity the
subscriber subscribed to receive from the community
energy facility during the immediately preceding month.
(B) If the subscriber subscribed to receive a specified
proportion of the community energy facility's generated
electricity in the immediately preceding month, the
subscriber's subscription amount equals:
(i) the proportion of the community energy facility's
generated electricity the subscriber subscribed to receive
in the immediately preceding month; multiplied by
(ii) the total amount of electricity generated by the
community energy facility in the immediately preceding
month.
(b) An electricity supplier shall provide to a subscribing
customer a credit on the subscribing customer's electricity bill for
a billing cycle that is equal to:
(1) the total subscription amount reported for the subscribing
customer by the community energy facility organization
under subsection (a)(2) for the billing cycle; multiplied by
(2) the applicable community energy credit rate established
by the commission in rules adopted by the commission under
section 14 of this chapter.
If the amount of a bill credit provided to a subscribing customer
for a billing cycle exceeds the amount of the subscribing customer's
bill for that billing cycle, the electricity supplier shall carry over
the amount of the excess in subsequent billing cycles until the full
amount of the excess has been credited to the subscribing
customer.
(c) An electricity supplier shall, not later than the fifteenth day
of each month, electronically report the following information to
a community energy facility organization that operates a
community energy facility that is interconnected with the
electricity supplier's facilities:
(1) The proportional output of the community energy facility
attributable to the subscription of each subscriber to the
community energy facility.
(2) The bill credit provided to each subscribing customer
under subsection (b) for the immediately preceding billing
cycle.
2026 IN 196—LS 6591/DI 150


(3) The applicable community energy credit rate established
by the commission in rules adopted by the commission under
section 14 of this chapter.
(d) An electricity supplier shall provide bill credits under this
section to a subscribing customer for the life of the community
energy facility to which the customer subscribes.
Sec. 11. An electricity supplier may not change the terms of
service of a subscribing customer on the basis of the subscribing
customer's subscription to a community energy facility.
Sec. 12. All environmental attributes of a community energy
facility, including renewable energy certificates, are property of
the owner of the community energy facility.
Sec. 13. A community energy facility is eligible for any incentive
programs offered to such facilities under applicable state or federal
law.
Sec. 14. (a) Not later than July 1, 2027, the commission shall
adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 necessary for the administration of
this chapter.
(b) The rules adopted by the commission under this section
must:
(1) be consistent with the state policy expressed in
IC 8-1-2-0.6;
(2) establish the community energy credit rate or rates to be
used for purposes of section 10 of this chapter, which must be
calculated to:
(A) allow for all classes of retail electric customers to
realize tangible economic benefits from subscribing to
community energy facilities; and
(B) create a viable financial market for community energy
development;
(3) establish uniform fees, standards, and processes for
interconnection that:
(A) are nondiscriminatory and not unreasonably
burdensome for operators of community energy facilities;
and
(B) allow an electricity supplier to recover reasonable costs
of interconnecting the electricity supplier's facilities with
a community energy facility;
(4) provide for recovery by an electricity supplier of
reasonable administrative costs associated with the electricity
supplier's provision of bill credits to the electricity supplier's
subscribing customers under section 10 of this chapter;
2026 IN 196—LS 6591/DI 150


(5) include mechanisms to ensure that low or moderate
income households are able to realize tangible economic
benefits from subscribing to community energy facilities;
(6) provide for:
(A) transferability of a subscription; and
(B) portability of a subscription such that the bill credit of
a subscribing customer under section 10 of this chapter is
not affected by the subscribing customer's relocation
within the service area of the electricity supplier;
(7) address whether, and the conditions under which, multiple
community energy facilities may be colocated on a single
parcel;
(8) provide that a:
(A) community energy facility located on:
(i) a brownfield;
(ii) a reclaimed mine land;
(iii) a commercial rooftop;
(iv) a parking lot; or
(v) any other already developed land;
may not have a nameplate capacity greater than twenty
(20) megawatts AC; and
(B) community energy facility located on:
(i) farmland; or
(ii) other undeveloped land;
may not have a nameplate capacity greater than five (5)
megawatts AC;
(9) require a community energy facility organization to
submit an annual report to the commission, in a form
determined by the commission, that:
(A) identifies the owner, manager, and operator of the
community energy facility organization;
(B) provides statistical results regarding the community
energy facility organization; and
(C) describes the community energy facility organization's
future plans for each community energy facility operated
by the community energy facility organization;
(10) require implementation by community energy facility
organizations of local hiring preferences for disadvantaged
business enterprises in a manner that meets or exceeds
standards for disadvantaged business enterprise engagement
in United States Department of Transportation Special
Experimental Project No. 14 (SEP-14) for Federal Highway
2026 IN 196—LS 6591/DI 150


Administration and Federal Transit Administration
contracts; and
(11) establish consumer protection standards with regard to
subscriptions to community energy facilities.
(c) In addition to rules adopted under subsection (b), the
commission may adopt any other rules the commission considers
appropriate or necessary for the administration of this chapter,
including rules regarding the following:
(1) The maximum proportion that the total nameplate
capacity of all community energy facilities statewide may bear
to statewide peak electricity demand, expressed as a
percentage of the statewide peak electricity demand.
(2) A minimum or maximum proportion of the total
nameplate capacity of a community energy facility that may
be allocated to a specified customer class of electricity
supplier.
Sec. 15. Notwithstanding any other law:
(1) a community energy facility organization is not a public
utility subject to IC 8-1-2 solely as a result of the community
energy facility organization's ownership or operation of a
community energy facility; and
(2) a subscriber is not a public utility subject to IC 8-1-2 solely
as a result of the subscriber's subscription to a community
energy facility.
Sec. 16. An investor owned utility may not:
(1) own a community energy facility; or
(2) offer incentive programs to a community energy facility.
Sec. 17. (a) As used in this section, "working group" refers to
the interconnection working group established under subsection
(b).
(b) Not later than October 1, 2027, the commission shall
establish an interconnection working group composed of:
(1) representatives of electricity suppliers; and
(2) other stakeholders with respect to electric utility service.
(c) The chairman of the commission, or the chairman's designee,
serves:
(1) as the chair; and
(2) as a nonvoting member;
of the working group.
(d) The working group shall meet at the call of the working
group's chair.
(e) A majority of the members of the working group constitutes
2026 IN 196—LS 6591/DI 150


a quorum.
(f) A member of the working group who is a member of the
general assembly is a nonvoting member of the working group.
(g) The affirmative vote of a majority of the voting members of
the working group is required for the working group to take action
on any measure, including adoption of the report under subsection
(m).
(h) The commission shall staff and provide oversight for the
working group.
(i) Except as provided under subsection (l), the expenses of the
working group shall be paid from funds appropriated to the
commission.
(j) A member of the working group who is not a state employee
is not entitled to the minimum salary per diem provided by
IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). The member is, however, entitled to
reimbursement for mileage and traveling expenses as provided
under IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses actually incurred in
connection with the member's duties as provided in the state
policies and procedures established by the Indiana department of
administration and approved by the budget agency.
(k) Each member of the working group who is a state employee,
but who is not a member of the general assembly, is entitled to
reimbursement for mileage and traveling expenses as provided
under IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses actually incurred in
connection with the member's duties as provided in the state
policies and procedures established by the Indiana department of
administration and approved by the budget agency.
(l) Each member of the working group who is a member of the
general assembly is entitled to receive the same per diem, mileage,
and travel allowances paid to legislative members of interim study
committees established by the legislative council. Per diem,
mileage, and travel allowances paid under this subsection shall be
paid from appropriations made to the legislative council or the
legislative services agency.
(m) The working group shall:
(1) review policies, processes, tariffs, rules, and standards
relating to the interconnection of community energy facilities
and electricity suppliers; and
(2) not later than March 31, 2028, submit to the commission
a report containing the working group's recommendations
regarding creation, revision, or elimination of policies,
processes, tariffs, rules, or standards relating to the
2026 IN 196—LS 6591/DI 150


interconnection of community energy facilities and electricity
suppliers as necessary for transparent, accurate, and efficient
implementation of this chapter.
(n) Not later than October 1, 2028, the commission shall adopt
regulations necessary to implement the recommendations
contained in the working group's report under subsection (m).
(o) This section expires January 1, 2029.
2026 IN 196—LS 6591/DI 150